06_Midterm/kaq.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Morpheme Border
%<v%>                ! Verb Stem
%<tv%>               ! Intransitive
%<perf%>             ! Perfective

%<s_sg1%>            ! Subject 1st Person
%<s_sg2%>            ! Subject 2nd Person
%<s_sg3%>            ! Subject 3rd Person
%<s_pl1%>            ! Subject One Plural
%<s_pl2%>            ! Subject Two Plural
%<s_pl3%>            ! Subject Three Plural

%<o_sg1%>            ! Object 1st Person
%<o_sg2%>            ! Object 2nd Person
%<o_sg3%>            ! Object 3rd Person
%<o_pl1%>            ! Object One Plural
%<o_pl2%>            ! Object Two Plural
%<o_pl3%>            ! Object Three Plural

%{r%}                ! Archiphone for [r], null, and [t]
%{'%}                ! Archiphone for null and [']
%{n%}                ! Archiphone for [n] and null

@U.TAM.Perf@

@U.S_AGR.SG1@
@U.S_AGR.SG2@
@U.S_AGR.SG3@
@U.S_AGR.PL1@
@U.S_AGR.PL2@
@U.S_AGR.PL3@

@U.O_AGR.SG1@
@U.O_AGR.SG2@
@U.O_AGR.SG3@
@U.O_AGR.PL1@
@U.O_AGR.PL2@
@U.O_AGR.PL3@

LEXICON Root

Aspect ;

LEXICON Aspect

@U.TAM.Perf@:@U.TAM.Perf@x%> AgrO ;

LEXICON AgrS

@U.S_AGR.SG1@:@U.S_AGR.SG1@nu%> TV ;
@U.S_AGR.SG2@:@U.S_AGR.SG2@a%> TV ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@:@U.S_AGR.SG3@%{r%}u%> TV ;
@U.S_AGR.PL1@:@U.S_AGR.PL1@qa%> TV ;
@U.S_AGR.PL2@:@U.S_AGR.PL2@%{'%}i%> TV ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ki%> TV ;

LEXICON AgrO

@U.O_AGR.SG1@:@U.O_AGR.SG1@i%{n%}%> AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.SG2@:@U.O_AGR.SG2@at%> AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.SG3@:@U.O_AGR.SG3@%> AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.PL1@:@U.O_AGR.PL1@oj%> AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.PL2@:@U.O_AGR.PL2@ix%> AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.PL3@:@U.O_AGR.PL3@e%> AgrS ;

LEXICON Object

@U.O_AGR.SG1@%<o_sg1%>:@U.O_AGR.SG1@ Subject_not_sg1_nor_pl1 ;
@U.O_AGR.SG2@%<o_sg2%>:@U.O_AGR.SG2@ Subject_not_sg2_nor_pl2 ;
@U.O_AGR.SG3@%<o_sg3%>:@U.O_AGR.SG3@ Subject_not_sg3 ;
@U.O_AGR.PL1@%<o_pl1%>:@U.O_AGR.PL1@ Subject_not_pl1_nor_sg1 ;
@U.O_AGR.PL2@%<o_pl2%>:@U.O_AGR.PL2@ Subject_not_pl2_nor_sg2 ;
@U.O_AGR.PL3@%<o_pl3%>:@U.O_AGR.PL3@ Subject_not_pl3 ;

LEXICON Subject_not_sg1_nor_pl1

@U.S_AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.S_AGR.SG2@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.S_AGR.SG3@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.S_AGR.PL2@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ # ;

LEXICON Subject_not_sg2_nor_pl2

@U.S_AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.S_AGR.SG1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.S_AGR.SG3@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.S_AGR.PL1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ # ;

LEXICON Subject_not_sg3

@U.S_AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.S_AGR.SG1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.S_AGR.SG2@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.S_AGR.PL1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.S_AGR.PL2@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ # ;

LEXICON Subject_not_pl1_nor_sg1

@U.S_AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.S_AGR.SG2@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.S_AGR.SG3@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.S_AGR.PL2@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ # ;

LEXICON Subject_not_pl2_nor_sg2

@U.S_AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.S_AGR.SG1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.S_AGR.SG3@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.S_AGR.PL1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ # ;

LEXICON Subject_not_pl3

@U.S_AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.S_AGR.SG1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.S_AGR.SG2@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.S_AGR.SG3@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.S_AGR.PL1@ # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.S_AGR.PL2@ # ;

LEXICON Asp

@U.TAM.Perf@%<perf%>:@U.TAM.Perf@ Object ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: Asp ;

LEXICON TV

tz'ät:tz'ät V-TV ; ! "to see"
